New York, session 2025-2026, S10219.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 3224-a of the insurance law is amended by adding a 2 new subsection (m) to read as follows: 3 (m)(1) Any insurance company which owns a health care provider must 4 pay any health care provider which it does not own an amount that is no 5 less than the amount that it pays a health care provider which it does 6 own for a comparable service. 7 (2) Any insurance company, which is owned by a health care provider, 8 may not pay any health care provider which does not own such insurance 9 company an amount that is less than the amount that it pays a health 10 care provider which does own such company for a comparable service. 11 § 2. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 12 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13704-09-6